Maryland, session 2026, SB0231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
11–402.
The Special Fund consists of:
(1) the State share of daily licensee fees;
(2) pari–mutuel taxes;
(3) the impact aid under § 11–812 of this title;
– 1 –

Ch. 84 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) money from uncashed pari–mutuel tickets that are from bets made into
the betting pools of licensees;
(5) any permit fees under §§ 11–820 and 11–832 of this title; [and]
(6) subject to § 11–403(a)(9) and (b) of this subtitle, money from the State
Lottery Fund distributed under § 9–120(b) of the State Government Article; AND
(7) ANY FINES COLLECTED UNDER § 11–1002(D) OF THIS TITLE.
11–1002.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “RACEHORSE” MEANS A HORSE:
(1) BRED OR INTENDED FOR RACING, INCLUDING A WEANLING,
YEARLING, HORSE IN TRAINING, OR RACEHORSE BREEDING STOCK WITH A RECORD
OF HAVING PRODUCED OR SIRED OFFSPRING INTENDED FOR RACING; OR
(2) THAT HAS BEEN RECORDED ON THE BACKSTRETCH OF A TRACK IN
THE STATE, HAS HAD A RECORDED WORKOUT ON A TRACK IN THE STATE, OR HAS
PARTICIPATED IN A RACE MEETING IN THE STATE WHERE PARI–MUTUEL BETTING
IS ALLOWED.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) SLAUGHTER OR CAUSE THE SLAUGHTER OF A RACEHORSE IN THE
STATE FOR ANY COMMERCIAL PURPOSE, INCLUDING FOR HUMAN OR ANIMAL
CONSUMPTION; OR
(2) PURCHASE, SELL, TRANSFER, OFFER FOR SALE, IMPORT INTO THE
STATE, OR TRANSPORT A RACEHORSE IF THE PERSON KNOWS OR REASONABLY
SHOULD KNOW THAT THE RACEHORSE WILL BE SLAUGHTERED FOR A COMMERCIAL
PURPOSE, INCLUDING FOR HUMAN OR ANIMAL CONSUMPTION.
(C) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION:
(I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $1,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH; OR
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 84
(2) A CORPORATION, PARTNERSHIP, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY THAT
VIOLATES THIS SECTION:
(I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $2,500; OR
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000.
(D) FINES COLLECTED BY THE COMMISSION AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE SPECIAL FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 11–401 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) IF THE COMMISSION OR THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
FINDS THAT A PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS SECTION:
(1) THE COMMISSION MAY REVOKE OR SUSPEND ANY LICENSE
ISSUED TO THE PERSON BY THE COMMISSION; AND
(2) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE MAY REVOKE OR
SUSPEND ANY LICENSE ISSUED TO THE PERSON BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE.
(F) THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF
THIS SECTION.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT
HUMANE EUTHANASIA OF A RACEHORSE BY A LICENSED VETERINARIAN FOR
REASONS UNRELATED TO COMMERCIAL PURPOSES, INCLUDING SEVERE INJURY,
MAIMING, OR INJURY THAT RESULTS IN NO QUALITY OF LIFE FOR THE RACEHORSE,
AS DETERMINED BY A LICENSED VETERINARIAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –